Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 501.
Title of chapter.

This chapter shall be known as the Vermont Natural Gas and Oil Conservation Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 502.
Purposes.

The prevention of waste of oil and gas, the promotion of conservation, and the protection of correlative rights of owners are declared to be in the public interest.

The purposes of this chapter are to:

encourage oil and gas exploration and production;

protect property rights and interests of all citizens;

prevent long-term harm to the environment and other resources that might occur through oil and gas activities;

protect correlative rights;

prevent undue waste of oil and gas;

promote greatest ultimate recovery of oil and gas, consistent with technology and economic conditions.

This purpose requires the creation of a Vermont Natural Gas and Oil Resources Board to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Whenever the Board exercises discretion and authority under this act, it shall do so only under the standards and purposes described in subsection (b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 503.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Vermont Natural Gas and Oil Resources Board.

“Certificate of clearance” means a permit prescribed by the Board for the transportation or the delivery of oil or gas or product.

“Correlative rights” means the reciprocal rights and duties of each owner in a reservoir to produce oil and gas in a manner that will not cause waste and in an amount representing his or her just and equitable share.

“Development drilling unit” means the area attributed by the Board to a well drilled or to be drilled in a known reservoir, for the purpose of allocating production so as to prevent waste and protect correlative rights.

“Drilling site” means all the land disturbed in preparing a site for the drilling of an oil and gas well, and related activities, including roadways and utility access.

“Exploratory drilling unit” means the area attributed by the Board to the first well drilled or to be drilled to test for a reservoir, for the purpose of allocating production so as to prevent waste and protect correlative rights.

“Field” means the general area underlaid by one or more reservoirs.

“Gas” means all natural gas, whether hydrocarbon or nonhydrocarbon, including hydrogen sulfide, helium, carbon dioxide, nitrogen, hydrogen, casinghead gas, and all other fluid hydrocarbons not defined as oil.

“Illegal oil” or “illegal gas” means oil or gas that has been produced from any well within the State in violation of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order of the Board.

“Illegal product” means any product derived in whole or in part from illegal oil or illegal gas.

“Just and equitable share of the production” means, as to each owner, that part of the authorized production from a reservoir that is reasonable in the proportion that the amount of recoverable oil or gas in the developed area of his or her tract or tracts in the reservoir bears to the recoverable oil or gas in the total of the developed areas in the reservoir.

“Lands” means all lands within the State, publicly or privately owned, over which the State, under its police power, has jurisdiction.

“Local agency” means any county, city, town, village, or other political subdivision and any local agency, board, commission, district, or other administrative body.

“Most efficient rate” means the rate at which a well can produce without inefficient, excessive, or improper use or dissipation of reservoir energy to achieve the maximum economically feasible recovery of oil or gas.

“Oil” means crude petroleum, oil, and all hydrocarbons, regardless of specific gravity, that are in the liquid phase in the reservoir and are produced at the wellhead in liquid form.

“Oil and gas” means both oil and gas, or either oil or gas, as the context may require to give effect to the purposes of this chapter.

“Operator” means the person who has been designated by the owners or the Board to operate the well or field-wide unit, and who is responsible for compliance with this chapter.

“Owner” means the person who has the right to drill into and produce from a reservoir and to appropriate the oil or gas that is produced, either for that person or for that person and others; and in the event that there is no oil and gas lease with respect to any land, the owner of the oil and gas rights shall be considered “owner” to the extent of seven-eighths of the oil and gas underlying the lands in question, and as “royalty interest holder” to the extent of one-eighth of the oil and gas.

“Plug and abandon” means the plugging, replugging if necessary, and abandonment of a well including the placing of all bridges, plugs, and fluids therein, and the restoration and reclamation of the drilling site to a condition reasonably consistent with the adjacent terrain and landscape.

“Producer” means the operator of a well or wells capable of producing oil or gas.

“Product” means any commodity made from oil or gas.

“Reservoir” means an underground accumulation of oil or gas that is a common source of supply, or several such accumulations that by rule or order of the Board are allowed to be produced on a commingled basis, and are treated by the Board as a common source of supply.

“Resources” means oil, gas, and their constituents, existing in or under lands within the State of Vermont.

“State lands” means all State-owned lands inside or outside the State, including the State-owned lands under the waters of Lake Champlain or any other waters.

“State land manager,” with respect to any State lands, means the secretary of any agency to which a department or division having responsibility for those lands is attached; or if not attached to an agency, the commissioner of a department or the chair of a board having responsibility for those lands; or if no agency has responsibility for the lands, the Secretary of Natural Resources.

“Unitization” means the combining of tracts and interests necessary to establish a field-wide area for the cooperative development or operation of all or part of a reservoir.

“Waste” includes:

the inefficient, excessive, or improper use or the unnecessary dissipation of reservoir energy;

the inefficient storing of oil or gas;

the locating, drilling, equipping, operating, or producing of an oil and gas well in a manner that causes or tends to cause reduction in the quantity of oil or gas that would be ultimately recoverable from a reservoir under prudent and proper operations, or that causes or tends to cause unnecessary wells to be drilled, or that causes or tends to cause surface or subsurface loss or destruction of oil or gas;

the unauthorized flaring of gas produced from an oil and condensate well after the Board has found that the use of gas is, or will be, economically feasible within a reasonable time on terms that are just and reasonable.

“Well log” means all information obtained in and from the drilled borehole including the driller’s log, geological log, geophysical log, hydrological log, and other information.

“Fluid” means any material or substance that flows or moves whether in semi-solid, liquid, sludge, gas, or any other form or state.

“Hydraulic fracturing” means the process of pumping a fluid into or under the surface of the ground in order to create fractures in rock for the purpose of the production or recovery of oil or gas.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982; amended

2011, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 16, 2012;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 286.

§ 504.
Composition of the Board.

The Board shall consist of five members who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. Appointments shall be for a term of three years and, in the event of death or resignation, successors shall serve out the term of the deceased or resigned member. The terms of members initially appointed shall be set so that not more than two terms shall expire in the same year. Annually, in February after new appointments, the Governor shall designate a chair.

In order for the Board to function in the best interests of the people of the State, Board members should have a knowledge of one or more of the following: geology, engineering, law, State and local government, economic development, environmental protection, regional planning, agriculture, or related fields of knowledge.

A person in the employ of or holding any official relation to any company subject to the supervision of the Board, or engaged in the management of such company, or owning stock, bonds, or other securities thereof, or who is, in any manner, connected with the operation of such company in this State, shall not be a member of the Board.

No member of the Board shall participate in any action of the Board that involves himself or herself or any person engaged in oil and gas development in which he or she has a financial interest.

Each prospective appointee or member of the Board shall have the affirmative duty to disclose any actual or potential conflicts of interest to the other members of the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 505.
Authority of the Board.

For the purposes of this chapter, the Board shall have authority over all lands and over all oil and gas resources. The Board shall prevent the waste of oil and gas, promote conservation, protect correlative rights, and otherwise administer and enforce this chapter. In the event of a conflict, the duty to prevent waste is paramount.

Without limiting its general authority, the Board may:

require identification of ownership of oil and gas wells, producing leases, tanks, processing plants, structures, and facilities for the transportation or refining of oil and gas;

require the making and filing of well logs, directional surveys, and reports on well location, drilling, and production; provided that all such records marked “confidential” shall be kept confidential for two years after their filing, unless the owner gives written permission to release them at an earlier date; provided, however, that the State Geologist is authorized access to this information. The Board may provide by rule for extension of the period of confidentiality for an additional period of one year upon written request of the owner and a showing of special circumstances requiring an extension;

require the drilling, casing, installation of proper equipment and facilities, operating, and plugging of wells in such manner as to prevent:

the escape of oil or gas out of one reservoir into another,

the detrimental intrusion of water into an oil or gas reservoir where that is avoidable by efficient operations,

the pollution of fresh water supplies by oil, gas, or salt water, or other substances,

blowouts, cave-ins, seepages, and fires;

require the testing of wells used in connection with the production of oil and gas including production, injection, and disposal wells;

require the licensing of oil and gas well drillers and the furnishing of a reasonable performance bond or other good and sufficient surety, conditioned for the performance of the duty to plug and restore the drilling site of each dry or abandoned well, and to repair each well causing waste or pollution if repair will prevent the waste or pollution;

require that production from wells be separated into gaseous and liquid hydrocarbons, and that each be measured by means and upon standards that may be prescribed by the Board;

require that wells be operated at efficient gas-oil or water-oil ratios or that production be limited from wells with inefficient gas-oil or water-oil ratios;

require certificates of clearance in connection with the transportation or delivery of oil, gas, or product;

require the metering or other measuring of oil, gas, or product;

require that every person who produces, sells, purchases, acquires, stores, transports, refines, or processes oil or gas in this State keep complete and accurate records of their quantities, which records shall be available for examination by the Board or its agents at all reasonable times;

require the filing of reports, plats, and other data related to matters within the Board’s jurisdiction;

regulate the drilling, testing, equipping, completing, operating, producing, and plugging of wells, and all other operations for the production of oil or gas;

regulate the stimulation and treatment of wells;

regulate the spacing or locating of wells;

regulate operations to increase ultimate recovery, such as cycling of gas, the maintenance of pressure, and the introduction of gas, water, or other substances into a reservoir;

regulate the disposal of salt water and oil field wastes;

determine the amount of oil or gas that may be produced without waste from any unit, reservoir, or field, and allocate the allowed production to and among the wells in such fields or reservoirs;

permit by rule or order the flaring of gas produced from an oil well, pending the time when, with reasonable diligence, the gas can be sold or otherwise utilized on terms that are just and reasonable, if such flaring is in the public interest;

identify reservoirs and classify or reclassify them as oil or gas reservoirs, and classify or reclassify wells as oil or gas wells;

adopt rules and make and enforce orders reasonably necessary to prevent waste, to protect correlative rights, to govern the practice and procedure before the Board and otherwise administer this chapter;

implement State responsibility under the National Gas Policy Act of 1978 for determining the statutory maximum lawful price for sales of natural gas;

the Board shall have no authority over sales of gasoline and related products covered by 9 V.S.A. chapter 109, nor any authority over petroleum inventory reporting covered by 9 V.S.A. chapter 110.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.